Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1285.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Biobonds Innovation Fund Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Clinical trial." A clinical investigation of a drug or medical device under investigation in a controlled clinical trial under any of the following:(1) An investigational new drug application in effect under 21 U.S.C. § 355(i) (relating to new drugs) or 42 U.S.C. 123456789101112131415161718 § 262(a)(3) (relating to regulation of biological products), as applicable.(2) An investigational device exemption in effect under 21 U.S.C. § 360j(g) (relating to general provisions respecting control of devices intended for human use)."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Eligible applicant." A person, business, university or research institution, nonprofit research organization or public-private partnership with a physical presence in this Commonwealth that conducts or seeks to conduct research with respect to a drug or medical device that is, or is planned to be, involved in one or more clinical trials."Eligible project." A project submitted by an eligible applicant under section 4 or 5 for financial assistance to support research or clinical trial-related activities authorized by the United States Food and Drug Administration for a drug or medical device that is the subject of a clinical trial."Fund." The Biobonds Innovation Fund established under section 3(a)."Loan." Financial assistance provided under section 4."Loan guarantee." A guarantee, insurance or other credit support provided under section 5 to reduce the cost of capital or enable financing for an eligible project.Section 3. Biobonds Innovation Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Biobonds Innovation Fund is established as a separate fund in the State Treasury.(b) Deposits.--The following shall be deposited into the fund:(1) Money appropriated by the General Assembly for the 20260SB1285PN1581 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 purposes of this act.(2) Proceeds of BioBonds issued under this act.(3) Repayments of loans, including principal, interest, fees, penalties and other amounts received under section 4.(4) Recoveries and proceeds arising from loan guarantees under section 5.(5) Private, Federal or other nonstate money accepted for the purposes of this act.(6) Interest earnings on money in the fund.(c) Use.--Money in the fund shall be used solely for the following:(1) Loans.(2) Loan guarantees and related credit support.(3) The reasonable costs of implementing this act, including underwriting, due diligence, monitoring, audits and program evaluation.(4) Payment of debt service or related costs.(d) Continuing appropriation.--Money in the fund is appropriated to the department on a continuing basis to implement this act.Section 4. Biobonds Innovation Fund Loan Program.(a) Program established.--The Biobonds Innovation Fund Loan Program is established within the department to provide low-interest loans to eligible applicants for eligible projects.(b) Guidelines.--The department shall prepare and adopt guidelines establishing all of the following:(1) Underwriting criteria and documentation requirements.(2) Review procedures, timelines and communications with applicants.20260SB1285PN1581 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Ranking and selection criteria under section 7.(4) Monitoring, reporting, audit and compliance requirements.(5) Other guidelines as reasonably necessary to implement the program.(c) Applications.--The department shall develop and post on its publicly accessible Internet website a rolling application process for the program. At a minimum, an application shall include all of the following:(1) A project narrative and work plan.(2) A project budget and statement of use of proceeds.(3) Evidence of clinical trial status or the planned submission timeline.(4) Financial statements and a proposed repayment plan.(5) A description of private capital leveraged, if any.(6) Certifications and disclosures required by the department, including conflict-of-interest disclosures when applicable.(d) Applicant requirements.--To receive a loan under the program, an eligible applicant shall meet all of the following requirements:(1) Maintain a physical presence in this Commonwealth.(2) Agree in writing to remain based in this Commonwealth and to conduct the majority of research activities supported by the loan in this Commonwealth for the duration of the loan term.(3) Certify compliance with applicable Federal and State laws, including licensing and regulatory requirements.(e) Awards.--The department shall accept applications and approve awards on a rolling basis.20260SB1285PN1581 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) Loan terms.--A loan under this section may not exceed an annual interest rate of 2%. The maximum aggregate principal amount of loans to a single eligible applicant under the program may not exceed $5,000,000. The department shall establish the maximum term, amortization schedule and permitted deferral periods and may tailor terms based on project timelines and risk. The department may require collateral, security interests, guarantees, letters of credit or other credit enhancement appropriate to protect the fund.(g) Eligible uses.--Loan proceeds may be used only for costs directly related to an eligible project, including the following:(1) Clinical trials authorized by the United States Food and Drug Administration, including Phase I, Phase II and Phase III clinical trial activities.(2) Preclinical translational research directly connected to a clinical trial pathway.(3) Regulatory preparation and submissions.(4) Manufacturing scale-up or quality systems tied to trial supply or trial readiness.(5) Data infrastructure, cybersecurity, software validation and trial operations systems directly supporting trial execution or compliance.(h) Ineligible uses.--Loan proceeds may not be used for any of the following:(1) Acquisition costs, mergers or purchase of controlling interests.(2) Marketing or advertising expenses unrelated to trial recruitment conducted in compliance with Federal and State law.20260SB1285PN1581 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Refinancing or repayment of existing debt, except as expressly permitted by departmental guideline to reduce overall project risk.(4) Executive compensation not directly attributable to performance of the eligible project.(i) Breach and remedies.--If the department determines that an eligible applicant materially breached a requirement specified in the application or a loan agreement, the department may declare the loan in default, accelerate repayment of outstanding principal and accrued interest and pursue available remedies, including any of the following:(1) Suspending disbursements.(2) Requiring a corrective action plan.(3) Assessing reasonable fees or penalties authorized by guideline.(4) Referring matters for enforcement if the department suspects fraud or material misrepresentation.(j) Custody and disbursements.--The State Treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. The department shall approve disbursements from the fund in accordance with this act.Section 5. Biobonds Innovation Fund Loan Guarantee Program.(a) Program established.--The Biobonds Innovation Fund Loan Guarantee Program is established within the department to provide loan guarantees or other credit support to eligible applicants for eligible projects to reduce borrowing costs and expand access to capital. In implementing the program, the department shall consult with the Department of Health and the State Treasurer.(b) Applications and standards.--The department shall accept applications for the program on a rolling basis. The department 20260SB1285PN1581 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall establish procedures and underwriting standards for the program.(c) Forms of support.--The department may provide any of the following under the program:(1) Guarantees of principal or interest.(2) Partial guarantees.(3) Credit insurance arrangements.(4) Other credit enhancement mechanisms as reasonably necessary to implement the program.(d) Limitations.--The department shall establish all of the following for the purposes of the program:(1) Maximum guarantee amounts.(2) The maximum percentage of a single obligation that may be guaranteed.(3) Eligible lenders or financing counterparties.(4) Required fees, reserves or risk-sharing terms.(5) Default, recovery and subrogation procedures.(e) Program costs.--Administrative and program costs may be paid from the fund, subject to reasonable limitations established by the department.Section 6. Duties of department.The department shall have the following duties:(1) Administer the fund, the Biobonds Innovation Fund Loan Program and the Biobonds Innovation Fund Loan Guarantee Program.(2) Develop and publish guidelines, forms and scoring criteria.(3) Conduct due diligence, underwriting, compliance monitoring and audits.(4) Contract for technical, scientific, legal or 20260SB1285PN1581 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 financial expertise necessary to evaluate eligible projects.(5) Coordinate with Commonwealth agencies, including the Department of Health, to assess the public health impact of funded projects.(6) Take actions necessary to collect repayments, enforce agreements and protect the assets in the fund.(7) Develop standard terms and conditions for loan agreements, guarantee agreements and related instruments.Section 7. Ranking and selection criteria.In awarding loans or guarantees under this act, the department shall consider and rank eligible projects based upon criteria established by the department. The criteria shall include, at a minimum, the following:(1) Public health impact.(2) Whether the project addresses an unmet medical need.(3) Scientific readiness and feasibility.(4) The amount of private capital leveraged.(5) Job creation, workforce development or economic impact within this Commonwealth.(6) Likelihood of commercialization or measurable deployment of the resulting drug or medical device.Section 8. Annual report.(a) Report required.--No later than October 31 of each year, the department shall provide an annual report to all of the following:(1) The Governor.(2) The President pro tempore of the Senate.(3) The Speaker of the House of Representatives.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.20260SB1285PN1581 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(6) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate.(7) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health Committee of the House of Representatives.(b) Contents.--The department shall include, at a minimum, all of the following in the annual report:(1) A current list of projects receiving assistance under the Biobonds Innovation Fund Loan Program and the Biobonds Innovation Fund Loan Guarantee Program.(2) The status and performance of loans and guarantees, including repayment and default rates.(3) The reasons for problems achieving desired volumes of BioBonds or the ability of the Biobonds Innovation Fund Loan Program and the Biobonds Innovation Fund Loan Guarantee Program to proceed at a faster pace.(4) An analysis of risk to this Commonwealth and the fund in providing guarantees and credit support.(5) Recommended improvements to the Biobonds Innovation Fund Loan Program and the Biobonds Innovation Fund Loan Guarantee Program.(6) Estimated economic impact of the Biobonds Innovation Fund Loan Program and the Biobonds Innovation Fund Loan Guarantee Program within this Commonwealth.(c) Posting.--The department shall post and maintain the annual report on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 9. Regulations.The department may promulgate regulations as necessary to 20260SB1285PN1581 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 implement this act.Section 10. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1285PN1581 - 10 - 123